District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.35l

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the Bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

History

June 21, 2014, D.C. Law 20-110, § 211, 61 DCR 4315